Ohio, session 136, HB183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 1547.15 of the Revised Code be 7
amended to read as follows: 8
Sec. 1547.15. Any person who operates a vessel towing any 9
person riding or attempting to ride upon one or more water skis 10
or upon a surfboard or similar device, or engaging or attempting 11
to engage in barefoot skiing, on the waters in this state shall 12
have present in the vessel a one or both of the following: 13
(A) A person or persons other than the operator, ten years 14
of age or older, who shall at all times observe the progress of 15
the person being towed; 16
(B) A rearview mirror that provides a wide field of vision 17
to the rear that is mounted so that the operator can observe the 18

H. B. No. 183 Page 2
As Introduced
activities of the person being towed. The 19
The operator of the towing vessel shall at all times 20
observe the traffic pattern toward which the vessel is 21
approaching. 22
No person shall operate or permit to be operated any 23
vessel on the waters in this state in violation of this section. 24
Section 2. That existing section 1547.15 of the Revised 25
Code is hereby repealed. 26